Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,157
Poster regarding reports of child abuse or neglect; authorized.

(1) Each public school in Nebraska may post in a clearly visible location in a public area of the school that is readily accessible to students a sign in English and Spanish, using terminology appropriate for posting in schools, that contains the statewide toll-free number established by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 28-711 to receive reports of child abuse or neglect. In lieu of displaying the poster, the school may post a link to the poster on its website.

(2) The State Department of Education may contract with an appropriate entity to create the poster described in subsection (1) of this section. The department shall ensure that schools have free and easy access to a digital image of such poster.

Laws 2019, LB281, § 1.